Florida, session 2026, SB1738.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.â(1)âThe Office of Educational Facilities and 13 the Office of Safe Schools within the Department of Education 14 shall collaborate with at least one state university that has 15 research experience in the design and construction of 16 educational facilities; district facilities directors; 17 representatives of the Florida Building Commission; and sheriffs 18 or police chiefs to review the State Requirements for 19 Educational Facilities required under s. 1013.37, Florida 20 Statutes, and make recommendations, as appropriate, to improve 21 teacher and student safety and accountability through a schoolâs 22 physical plant. The review must include all of the following: 23 (a)âRecommended changes in new construction and renovations 24 which may reduce the occurrence of misconduct between teachers 25 and students and between students. Such misconduct may include, 26 but is not limited to, physical and sexual abuse, inappropriate 27 relationships with students, bullying, and harassment. 28 (b)âAn examination of the principles of crime prevention 29 through environmental design as defined in s. 163.503(6), 30 Florida Statutes, and their application to recommendations under 31 this section. The review team must include a representative who 32 has achieved a Florida Crime Prevention Through Environmental 33 Design Practitioner designation by the Office of the Attorney 34 General. 35 (c)âConfigurations of a physical plant, such as using 36 lighting, windows, doors, mirrors, and cameras, to ensure that 37 student interactions with adults are observable and that there 38 are opportunities for the interactions to be interrupted, to 39 reduce times that a student may be isolated, and to maintain 40 access control over spaces. 41 (2)âRecommendations must be submitted to the department, 42 which shall transmit the recommendations and any comments as a 43 part of its next biennial review to the Florida Building 44 Commission consistent with s. 1013.37(4), Florida Statutes, with 45 copies to the Governor, the State Fire Marshal, the President of 46 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 47 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.